Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB493.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding sections to read:§ 5703. Cash bail prohibited.A defendant's release may not be conditioned upon the deposit of any amount of cash or upon the compliance with a monetary condition.§ 5704. Conditions of release.(a) Pretrial release.--A court, magistrate or judicial official shall order the pretrial release of a defendant unless the Commonwealth moves for the defendant's pretrial detention and the court, magistrate or judicial officer finds, by clear 1234567891011121314151617181920 and convincing evidence, that the defendant committed a felony offense as charged by the Commonwealth and the defendant poses an imminent risk of serious harm to an individual or the community and that no condition or combination of conditions of release can mitigate that serious risk of harm.(b) Nonmonetary conditions.--The court, magistrate or judicial officer may impose one or more nonmonetary conditions of release when the condition or combination of conditions is necessary to reasonably ensure the defendant's appearance in court or safety to an individual or the community.(c) Contest of court order.--If the court orders the defendant's pretrial detention or the defendant is unable to meet the nonmonetary conditions of release ordered by the court, the defendant shall have the right to contest the order at a detention review hearing. The detention review hearing shall be held within 48 hours of the detention order or imposition of unmet conditions of release.(d) Rights of defendant.--At a pretrial hearing which may result in the loss of or infringement upon the defendant's liberty, the defendant shall be entitled to the following:(1) The right to be present during the pretrial hearing.(2) The right to be represented by counsel. If the defendant cannot afford an attorney and qualifies for representation by a public defender in a criminal case, the court shall appoint counsel.(3) The right to confront and cross-examine witnesses.(4) The right to present evidence.(5) The right to an expedited appeal of an order resulting in pretrial detention.§ 5705. Collection and report of pretrial release data.20250SB0493PN0448 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Collection and publication.--Each county shall collect and annually publish data disaggregated by race, gender and ethnicity relating to the pretrial detention and release of defendants, including the following:(1) The number of detention-eligible defendants.(2) The number of defendants for whom the Commonwealth sought detention at the first hearing for which a detention decision was made.(3) The number of defendants ordered to be detained at the first hearing for which a detention decision was made.(4) The number of defendants for whom a detention review hearing was scheduled.(5) The number of defendants for whom the Commonwealth sought detention at the detention review hearing.(6) The number of defendants for whom pretrial detention was ordered at the detention review hearing.(7) The percentage of detention-eligible defendants who remain detained from arrest until the resolution of their case.(8) The average number of days defendants ordered to pretrial detention remain in custody from arrest to the resolution of their case.(b) Publication.--A county shall publish the data collected under subsection (a) on the county's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. Section 9771(b) of Title 42 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 9771. Modification or revocation of order of probation.* * *(b) Revocation.--The court may increase the conditions, 20250SB0493PN0448 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 impose a brief sanction under section 9771.1 (relating to court-imposed sanctions for violating probation) or revoke an order of probation upon proof of the violation of specified conditions of the probation. Subject to the limitations of subsections (b.1), (b.2) and (c), upon revocation the sentencing alternatives available to the court shall be the same as were available at the time of initial sentencing, due consideration being given to the time spent serving the order of probation. The attorney for the Commonwealth may file notice at any time prior to resentencing of the Commonwealth's intention to proceed under an applicable provision of law requiring a mandatory minimum sentence.* * *(b.2) Nonpayment of electronic monitoring fees.--Notwithstanding subsection (b), a court may not revoke an order of probation due to the failure of a defendant to pay electronic monitoring fees.* * *Section 3. The regulations of 234 Pa. Code Ch. 5 Pt. C(1) are abrogated insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 5703, 5704 and 5705.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0493PN0448 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122